Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.050

Certificate expiration and renewal.

(1) A certificate expires on December 31st.

(2) The certificate shall be renewed every other year.

(3) Before the expiration date of the certificate, every applicant shall reapply to the director on an application form provided by the director and pay the application fee as provided by rule.

(4) If a certificate is not renewed before its expiration date, an applicant must:

(a) Apply to the director on an application form provided by the director;

(b) Pay an application fee to the director as provided by rule;

(c) Pay an examination fee as provided by rule; and

(d) Successfully pass the written examination required by this chapter.

[ 2007 c 435 s 6.]